src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ.aff
SFX G Y 1132
SFX G il lim/IJKLM il
SFX G il limni/IJKLM il
SFX G il limning/IJKLM il
SFX G il limga/IJKLM il
SFX G il limdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il limda/IJKLM il
SFX G il limiz/IJKLM il
SFX G il limizni/IJKLM il
SFX G il limizning/IJKLM il
SFX G il limizga/IJKLM il
SFX G il limizdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il limizda/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarim/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimni/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimning/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimga/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimda/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimiz/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimizni/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimizning/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimizga/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimizdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarimizda/IJKLM il
SFX G il ling/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingni/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingning/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingga/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingda/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingiz/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingizni/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingizning/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingizga/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingizdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il lingizda/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaring/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringni/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringning/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringga/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringda/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringiz/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringizni/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringizning/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringizga/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringizdan/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaringizda/IJKLM il
SFX G il li/IJKLM il
SFX G il lini/IJKLM il
SFX G il lining/IJKLM il
SFX G il liga/IJKLM il
SFX G il lidan/IJKLM il
SFX G il lida/IJKLM il
SFX G il lisi/IJKLM il
SFX G il lisini/IJKLM il
SFX G il lisining/IJKLM il
SFX G il lisiga/IJKLM il
SFX G il lisidan/IJKLM il
SFX G il lisida/IJKLM il
SFX G il illari/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarini/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarining/IJKLM il
SFX G il illariga/IJKLM il
SFX G il illaridan/IJKLM il
SFX G il illarida/IJKLM il
SFX G il limdek il
SFX G il limday il
SFX G il limizdek il
SFX G il limizday il
SFX G il illarimdek il
SFX G il illarimday il
SFX G il illarimizdek il
SFX G il illarimizday il
SFX G il lingdek il
SFX G il lingday il
SFX G il lingizdek il
SFX G il lingizday il
SFX G il illaringdek il
SFX G il illaringday il
SFX G il illaringizdek il
SFX G il illaringizday il
SFX G il lidek il
SFX G il liday il
SFX G il lisidek il
SFX G il lisiday il
SFX G il illaridek il
SFX G il illariday il
SFX G il limcha il
SFX G il limizcha il
SFX G il illarimcha il
SFX G il illarimizcha il
SFX G il lingcha il
SFX G il lingizcha il
SFX G il illaringcha il
SFX G il illaringizcha il
SFX G il licha il
SFX G il lisicha il
SFX G il illaricha il
SFX G il lin il
SFX G il limdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limizdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limizdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limizdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limizdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimizdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimizdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimizdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illarimizdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingizdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingizdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingizdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lingizdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringizdagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringizdagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringizdagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaringizdagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lidagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lidagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lidagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lidagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lisidagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lisidagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lisidagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il lisidagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaridagi/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaridagilar/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaridagidek/IJKLMN il
SFX G il illaridagiday/IJKLMN il
SFX G il limniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il limizniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il illarimniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il illarimizniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il lingniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il lingizniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il illaringniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il illaringizniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il liniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il lisiniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il illariniki/IJKLMO il
SFX G il limgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il limizgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il illarimgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il illarimizgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il linggacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il lingizgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il illaringgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il illaringizgacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il ligacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il lisigacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G il illarigacha/IJKLMP il
SFX G un nim/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimni/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimning/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimga/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimda/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimiz/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimizni/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimizning/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimizga/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimizdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimizda/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarim/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimni/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimning/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimga/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimda/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimiz/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimizni/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimizning/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimizga/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimizdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarimizda/IJKLM un
SFX G un ning/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningni/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningning/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningga/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningda/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningiz/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningizni/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningizning/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningizga/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningizdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un ningizda/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaring/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringni/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringning/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringga/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringda/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringiz/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringizni/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringizning/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringizga/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringizdan/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaringizda/IJKLM un
SFX G un ni/IJKLM un
SFX G un nini/IJKLM un
SFX G un nining/IJKLM un
SFX G un niga/IJKLM un
SFX G un nidan/IJKLM un
SFX G un nida/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlari/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarini/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarining/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlariga/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlaridan/IJKLM un
SFX G un unlarida/IJKLM un
SFX G un nimdek un
SFX G un nimday un
SFX G un nimizdek un
SFX G un nimizday un
SFX G un unlarimdek un
SFX G un unlarimday un
SFX G un unlarimizdek un
SFX G un unlarimizday un
SFX G un ningdek un
SFX G un ningday un
SFX G un ningizdek un
SFX G un ningizday un
SFX G un unlaringdek un
SFX G un unlaringday un
SFX G un unlaringizdek un
SFX G un unlaringizday un
SFX G un nidek un
SFX G un niday un
SFX G un unlaridek un
SFX G un unlariday un
SFX G un nimcha un
SFX G un nimizcha un
SFX G un unlarimcha un
SFX G un unlarimizcha un
SFX G un ningcha un
SFX G un ningizcha un
SFX G un unlaringcha un
SFX G un unlaringizcha un
SFX G un nicha un
SFX G un unlaricha un
SFX G un nin un
SFX G un nimdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimizdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimizdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimizdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nimizdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimizdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimizdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimizdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlarimizdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningizdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningizdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningizdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un ningizdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringizdagi/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringizdagilar/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringizdagidek/IJKLMN un
SFX G un unlaringizdagiday/IJKLMN un
SFX G un nidagi/IJKLMN un
